Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1505.02
Mineral exploration holes; rules and regulations.

The council may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing mineral exploration holes prior to August 1, 1983, but such rules and regulations shall not be effective until such date.

The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations authorized by the amendments made by Laws 1983, LB 356, to subsection (9) of section 81-1505 within one hundred twenty days of May 26, 1983. All requirements of the Environmental Protection Act shall apply to any permit application regardless of the date of submission, except that the department shall continue to diligently process any application submitted prior to May 26, 1983.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 9.